Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-119
Nebraska State Historical Society; powers and duties.

The Nebraska State Historical Society shall be charged with the duty of marking and preserving the historical landmarks of Nebraska. It may hold property and be a party to suits and contracts.

Laws 1957, c. 384, § 1, p. 1339;

Laws 1959, c. 441, § 1, p. 1482;

Laws 1961, c. 440, § 1, p. 1358;

Laws 1965, c. 557, § 1, p. 1840;

R.R.S.1943, § 82-201;

Laws 1969, c. 811, § 1, p. 3048.